test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-poikw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - poikõ : # Noun 'boy/poika/poiss/мальчик' - full paradigm
# Heinsoo, Heinike 2015: Vadʼdʼa sõnakopittõja. Tartu-Helsinki. (88-89).
     poikõ+N+Sg+Nom: poikõ
     poikõ+N+Sg+Gen: poiga
     poikõ+N+Sg+Par: poikaa
     poikõ+N+Sg+Ill: [poikaa, poikasõ]
     poikõ+N+Sg+Ine: poigõz
     poikõ+N+Sg+Ela: poigõssõ
     poikõ+N+Sg+All: poigõllõ
     poikõ+N+Sg+Ade: poigõllõ
     poikõ+N+Sg+Abl: poigõltõ
     poikõ+N+Sg+Tra: poigõssi
     poikõ+N+Sg+Ter: poikaassaa
     poikõ+N+Sg+Com: poigaka
     poikõ+N+Pl+Nom: poigõd
     poikõ+N+Pl+Gen: [poiki, poikije]
     poikõ+N+Pl+Par: [poiki, poikitõ]
     poikõ+N+Pl+Ill: [poiki, poikisõ]
     poikõ+N+Pl+Ine: poikiz
     poikõ+N+Pl+Ela: poikissõ
     poikõ+N+Pl+All: poikillõ
     poikõ+N+Pl+Ade: poikillõ
     poikõ+N+Pl+Abl: poikiltõ
     poikõ+N+Pl+Tra: poikissi
     poikõ+N+Pl+Ter: poikissaa
     poikõ+N+Pl+Com: poikika
